North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122A. North Carolina Housing Finance Agency.
§ 122A-5.13.
Adult Care Home, Group Home, and Nursing Home Fire Protection Fund authorized; authority.

The North Carolina Housing Finance Agency shall establish an Adult Care Home, Group Home, and Nursing Home Fire Protection Fund (hereinafter “Fire Protection Fund”) to assist owners of adult care homes, group homes for developmentally disabled adults, and nursing homes with the purchase and installation of fire protection systems and emergency generators in existing and new adult care homes, group homes for developmentally disabled adults, and nursing homes. The Fire Protection Fund shall be a revolving fund.

The Agency, in consultation with the Department of Health and Human Services, shall adopt rules for the management and use of the Fire Protection Fund. These rules at a minimum shall provide for the following:

Financial incentives for owners of facilities who utilize Fire Protection Fund monies to install sprinkler systems instead of smoke detection equipment.

Maximum loan amounts of one dollar and seventy-five cents ($1.75) per square foot for advanced smoke detectors and digital communication equipment, three dollars and seventy-five cents ($3.75) per square foot for residential sprinkler systems, and six dollars ($6.00) per square foot for institutional sprinkler systems.

Interest rates from three percent (3%) to six percent (6%) for a period not to exceed 20 years for sprinkler systems and 10 years for smoke detection systems.

Documentary verification that owners of facilities obtain fire protection systems and emergency generators at a reasonable cost.

Acceleration of a loan when statutory fire protection requirements are not met by the facility for which the loan was made.

Loan approval priority criteria that considers the frailty level of residents at a facility.

Loan origination and servicing fees.

Proceeds from the Fire Protection Fund, not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) annually, may be used to provide staff support to the North Carolina Housing Finance Agency for loan processing under this section and to the Department of Health and Human Services for review and approval of fire protection plans and inspection of fire protection systems.

History.

1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 24.26B(a); 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1999-237, s. 11.17; 2000-67, s. 11.10.

§ 122A-5.14.
Home Protection Program and Fund.

The North Carolina Housing Finance Agency shall establish and administer the Home Protection Program (“Program”) to assist North Carolina workers who have lost jobs as a result of changing economic conditions in North Carolina when the workers are in need of assistance to avoid losing their homes to foreclosure. The Agency shall do all of the following:

Develop and administer the Home Protection Program Fund (“Fund”) to ensure that workers in North Carolina have assistance to avoid losing their homes to foreclosure.

Make loans secured by liens on residential real property located in North Carolina to property owners who are eligible for those loans.

Develop and administer procedures by which property owners at risk of being foreclosed upon may qualify for assistance.

Designate, approve, and fund nonprofit counseling agencies in North Carolina to be available to assist the Agency in implementing the provisions of this section, provide services such as direct mortgagee negotiations on behalf of unemployed workers, and process loan applications for the Agency.

Develop and fund enhanced methods by which workers may be notified of foreclosure mitigation services, may easily contact local nonprofit counseling agencies, and may apply for loans from the Agency.

Home Protection Period. — Notwithstanding Chapters 23, 24, and 45 of the General Statutes or any other provision of law, upon the proper filing of an application for loan assistance by a mortgagor under this section, a mortgagee shall not do the following for a period of 120 days following the date of the mortgagor’s properly filed application:

Accelerate the maturity of any mortgage obligation covered under this section.

Commence or continue any legal action, including mortgage foreclosure pursuant to Chapter 45 of the General Statutes, to recover the mortgage obligation.

Take possession of any security of the mortgagor for the mortgage obligation.

Procure or receive a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

Enter judgment by confession pursuant to a note accompanying a mortgage.

Proceed to enforce the mortgage obligation pursuant to applicable rules of civil procedure.The provisions of this section shall not apply if the mortgagee receives notice from the Agency that the mortgagor’s application has been denied.If a mortgagee acts as proscribed in subdivisions (1) through (6) of this subsection, a mortgagor shall be entitled to injunctive relief without the necessity of providing a bond. This relief shall be in addition to any defenses available under G.S. 45-21.16(d) and any other remedies at law or equity.Upon the Agency’s receipt of a properly filed mortgagor’s application for loan assistance, the Agency shall mail notice of the application to the mortgagor’s mortgagee within 10 business days of the Agency’s receipt of the application. The Agency shall also mail notice of the acceptance or denial of the mortgagor’s application to the mortgagee within five days of the Agency’s determination. Notice shall be deemed sufficient if sent to the last known address of the mortgagee.

Rule Making. — Solely with respect to the adoption of procedures for the program by which property owners at risk of being foreclosed upon may qualify for assistance, the Agency is exempt from the requirements of Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. Prior to adoption or amendment of procedures, the Agency shall:

Publish the proposed procedures in the North Carolina Register at least 30 days prior to the adoption of the final procedures.

Accept oral and written comments on the proposed procedures.

Hold at least one public hearing on the proposed procedures.

Annual Report. — By April 1 of each year, the Agency shall report to the House Appropriations Subcommittee on General Government and Senate Appropriations Subcommittee on General Government and Information Technology on the effectiveness of the Program in accomplishing its purposes and provide any other information the Agency determines is pertinent or that the General Assembly requests.

History.

2008-107, s. 21.1(c).

§ 122A-5.15.
Workforce Housing Loan Program.

The North Carolina Housing Finance Agency shall establish and administer the Workforce Housing Loan Program for the purpose of making revolving loans for qualified low-income housing development in the State. Funds appropriated to the North Carolina Housing Trust Fund for the Workforce Housing Loan Program shall be used by the Agency only as provided in this section.

The following definitions apply in this section:

Code. — As defined in

G.S. 105-228.90

.

Qualified North Carolina low-income housing development. — A qualified low-income project or building that is allocated a federal tax credit under section 42(h)(1) of the Code.

Qualified residential unit. — A housing unit that meets the requirements of section 42 of the Code.

A taxpayer allocated a federal low-income housing tax credit under section 42 of the Code to construct or substantially rehabilitate a qualified North Carolina low-income housing development is eligible for a loan under the Workforce Housing Loan Program if the taxpayer satisfies the loan criteria established by the Agency. The loan criteria shall support the financing of similar types of developments as provided in

G.S. 105-129.42

and shall be developed in partnership with developers of low-income housing in the State who receive a federal low-income housing tax credit under section 42 of the Code. The Agency shall take into consideration all eligible sources of funding for each development project, including whether there are other eligible sources of funding available for the development project. No loan made to a taxpayer under this section shall exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000) if the low-income housing development is located in a low-income county, as designated by the Agency; one million five hundred dollars ($1,500,000) in a moderate-income county, as designated by the Agency; and two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in a high-income county, as designated by the Agency.

By February 1 of each year, the Agency shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and the Fiscal Research Division on the number of loans made under this section, the amount of each loan, and whether the low-income housing development is located in a low-, moderate-, or high-income county, as designated by the Agency.

History.

2017-57, s. 28.1; 2021-180, s. 29.4(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 29.4(c), provides: “Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law or guidelines, loans made from the Workforce Housing Loan Program using funds appropriated to the Program from the State Fiscal Recovery Fund shall be repaid to the Program for the purpose of making revolving loans as authorized by

G.S. 122A-5.15

.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 29.4(d), as amended by Session Laws 2021-189, s. 6.4, provides: “Funds appropriated in this act from the State Fiscal Recovery Fund to the North Carolina Housing Finance Agency for the 2021-2022 fiscal year shall be used first to address funding gaps in previously awarded deals for eligible projects under

G.S. 122A-5.15

resulting from the COVID-19 pandemic, including any cost increases, as determined by the Agency. Any funds remaining after the funding gaps have been addressed shall be used to make loans for new eligible projects under

G.S. 122A-5.15

. The cap on the amount of loans that may be made under G.S. 122A-5.15(c) shall not apply to funds used to address funding gaps in previously awarded deals for eligible projects.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 29.4(a), effective November 18, 2021, in subsection (a), added “revolving” after “making” in the first sentence.

§ 122A-6.
Credit of State not pledged.

Obligations issued under the provisions of this Chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a debt, liability or obligation of the State or of any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the State or of any such political subdivision, but shall be payable solely from the revenues or assets of the Agency. Each obligation issued under this Chapter shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the Agency shall not be obligated to pay the same nor the interest thereon except from the revenues or assets pledged therefor and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State or of any political subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such obligation.

Expenses incurred by the Agency in carrying out the provisions of this Chapter may be made payable from funds provided pursuant to this Chapter and no liability shall be incurred by the Agency hereunder beyond the extent to which moneys shall have been so provided. Provided the provisions of this section do not apply to the liability of the Agency with respect to energy conservation loan guarantees.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 6; 1973, c. 1296, s. 46; 1977, c. 1083, s. 4.

§ 122A-6.1.
Credit of State not pledged to satisfy liabilities under energy conservation loan guarantees.

Energy conservation loan guarantees issued under the provisions of this Chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a debt, liability, obligation of the State or of any political subdivision thereof, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the State or of any political subdivision thereof, but shall be payable solely from any unspent specific appropriations by the General Assembly for the energy conservation loan guarantee program and any donations and grants for this specific purpose. Each guarantee issued by the Agency shall contain on its face a statement to the effect that the Agency shall not be obligated to pay the same nor the interest thereon except from the unspent specific appropriations by the General Assembly for the energy conservation loan guarantee program and any specific donations and grants for this purpose, and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State or of any political subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such guarantees.

Provided any recoveries from the borrower or others which ultimately reduce the amounts paid out by the Agency in satisfaction of its liabilities under the energy conservation loan guarantee program shall be deemed unspent appropriations, donations or grants.

History.

1977, c. 1083, s. 5.

§ 122A-7.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1296, s. 47.

§ 122A-8.
Bonds and notes.

The Agency is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance, at one time or from time to time, of bonds and notes of the Agency to carry out and effectuate its corporate purposes. The Agency also is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance, at one time or from time to time of (i) bond anticipation notes in anticipation of the issuance of such bonds and (ii) construction loan notes to finance the making or purchase of mortgage loans to sponsors of residential housing for the construction, rehabilitation or improvement of residential housing. The total amount of bonds, bond anticipation notes, and construction loan notes outstanding at any one time shall not exceed three billion dollars ($3,000,000,000) excluding therefrom any bond anticipation notes for the payment of which bonds have been issued. The principal of and the interest on such bonds or notes shall be payable solely from the funds herein provided for such payment. Any such notes may be made payable from the proceeds of bonds or renewal notes or, in the event bond or renewal note proceeds are not available, such notes may be paid from any available revenues or assets of the Agency. The bonds or notes of each issue shall be dated and may be made redeemable before maturity at the option of the Agency at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be determined by the Agency. Any such bonds or notes shall bear interest at such rate or rates as may be determined by the Local Government Commission of North Carolina with the approval of the Agency. Notes shall mature at such time or times not exceeding 10 years from their date or dates and bonds shall mature at such time or times not exceeding 43 years from their date or dates, as may be determined by the Agency. The Agency shall determine the form and manner of execution of the bonds or notes, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations and the place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be any bank or trust company within or without the State. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds or notes or coupons attached thereto shall cease to be such officer before the delivery thereof, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. The Agency may also provide for the authentication of the bonds or notes by a trustee or fiscal agent. The bonds or notes may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the Agency may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds or notes as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the reconversion into coupon bonds or notes of any bonds or notes registered as to both principal and interest, and for the interchange of registered and coupon bonds or notes. Upon the filing with the Local Government Commission of North Carolina of a resolution of the Agency requesting that its bonds and notes be sold, such bonds or notes may be sold in such manner, either at public or private sale, and for such price as the Commission shall determine to be for the best interest of the Agency and best effectuate the purposes of this Chapter, as long as the sale is approved by the Agency.

The proceeds of any bonds or notes shall be used solely for the purposes for which issued and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the Agency may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or notes or in the trust agreement hereinafter mentioned securing the same.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the Agency may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The Agency may also provide for the replacement of any bonds or notes which shall become mutilated or shall be destroyed or lost.

Bonds or notes may be issued under the provisions of this Chapter without obtaining, except as otherwise expressly provided in this Chapter, the consent of any department, division, commission, board, body, bureau or agency of the State, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions or things which are specifically required by this Chapter and the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or notes or the trust agreement securing the same.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 8; 1973, c. 1296, s. 48; 1979, c. 844; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1238, s. 2; 1981, c. 343; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1062, s. 2; 1985, c. 769, s. 2; 1997-13, s. 1; 2001-185, s. 1.

§ 122A-8.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2008-194, s. 1(b), effective August 8, 2008.

§ 122A-9.
Trust agreement or resolution.

In the discretion of the Agency any obligations issued under the provisions of this Chapter may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the Agency and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the State. Such trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such obligations may pledge or assign all or any part of the revenues or assets of the Agency, including, without limitation, mortgage loans, mortgage loan commitments, contracts, agreements and other security or investment obligations, the fees or charges made or received by the Agency, the moneys received in payment of loans and interest thereon and any other moneys received or to be received by the Agency. Such trust agreement or resolution may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the holders of any such obligations as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the Agency in relation to the purposes to which obligation proceeds may be applied, the disposition or pledging of the revenues or assets of the Agency, the terms and conditions for the issuance of additional obligations, and the custody, safeguarding and application of all moneys. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the State which may act as depositary of the proceeds of obligations, revenues or other money hereunder to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the Agency. Any such trust agreement or resolution may set forth the rights and remedies of the holders of any obligations and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by any such holders. In addition to the foregoing, any such trust agreement or resolution may contain such other provisions as the Agency may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the holders of any obligations. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust agreement or resolution may be paid from the revenues or assets pledged or assigned to the payment of the principal of and the interest on obligations or from any other funds available to the Agency.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 9; 1973, c. 1296, s. 49.

§ 122A-10.
Validity of any pledge.

The pledge of any assets or revenues of the Agency to the payment of the principal of or the interest on any obligations of the Agency shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made and any such assets or revenues shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the Agency, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the Agency from selling any assets subject to any such pledge except to the extent that any such sale may be restricted by the trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of such obligations.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 10; 1973, c. 1296, s. 50.

§ 122A-11.
Trust funds.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, all moneys received pursuant to the authority of this Chapter shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this Chapter. The resolution authorizing any obligations or the trust agreement securing the same may provide that any of such moneys may be temporarily invested pending the disbursement thereof and shall provide that any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, such moneys shall be deposited shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes hereof, subject to such regulations as this Chapter and such resolution or trust agreement may provide.

Any moneys received pursuant to the authority of this Chapter and any other moneys available to the Agency for investment may be invested:

As provided in

G.S. 159-30

, except that for purposes of

G.S. 159-30

(b) the Agency may deposit moneys at interest in banks or trust companies outside as well as in this State, as long as any moneys at deposit outside this State are collateralized to the same extent and manner as if at deposit in this State;

In evidences of ownership of, or fractional undivided interests in, future interest and principal payments on either direct obligations of the United States government or obligations the principal of and the interest on which are guaranteed by the United States government, which obligations are held by a bank or trust company organized and existing under the laws of the United States of America or any state in the capacity of custodian;

In obligations which are collateralized by mortgage pass-through securities guaranteed by the Government National Mortgage Association, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, or Fannie Mae;

In a trust certificate or similar instrument evidencing an equity investment in a trust or other similar arrangement which is formed for the purpose of issuing obligations which are collateralized by mortgage pass-through or participation certificates guaranteed by the Government National Mortgage Association, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation or Fannie Mae; and

In repurchase agreements with respect to (i) direct obligations of the United States government, (ii) obligations the principal of and the interest on which are guaranteed by the United States government, or (iii) obligations described in G.S. 159-30(c)(2), (3), (6), or (7), if all of the following conditions are met:

The repurchase agreement is entered into with an institution whose ability to pay its unsecured long-term obligations (including, if the institution is an insurance company, its claims paying ability) is rated in one of the two highest ratings categories by a nationally recognized securities rating agency. If the term of the repurchase agreement is for a period of one year or less, however, the repurchase agreement may be entered into with an institution that does not have such a long-term rating if its ability to pay its unsecured short-term obligations is rated in one of the two highest ratings categories by a nationally recognized securities rating agency. If the institution with which the agreement is to be entered does not meet the ratings requirement of this subparagraph, the repurchase agreement may nevertheless be entered into with the institution if the obligations of the institution under the repurchase agreement are fully guaranteed by another institution that does meet the ratings requirement of this subparagraph.

The repurchase agreement provides that it shall be terminated, without penalty, if the institution with which the repurchase agreement is entered or by whom the institution’s obligations are guaranteed fails to maintain (i) in the event that the repurchase agreement was entered into in reliance upon the rating of the institution’s long-term obligations, a rating of its long-term obligations in one of the three highest ratings categories by at least one nationally recognized securities rating agency, or (ii) in the event that the repurchase agreement was entered into in reliance upon the rating of the institution’s short-term obligations, a rating of its short-term obligations in one of the two highest ratings categories by at least one nationally recognized securities rating agency. The repurchase agreement does not have to be terminated, however, if a new guarantor meeting the rating requirement set forth in subparagraph a. as the requirement necessary for the Agency to enter the repurchase agreement agrees to fully guarantee the obligations of the institution under the repurchase agreement.

The obligations that are subject to the repurchase agreement are delivered (in physical or in book entry form) to the Agency, or any financial institution serving either as trustee for obligations issued by the Agency or as fiscal agent for the Agency or the State Treasurer or are supported by a safekeeping receipt issued by a depository satisfactory to the Agency. The repurchase agreement must provide that the value of the underlying obligations shall be maintained at a current market value, calculated at least daily, of not less than one hundred percent (100%) of the repurchase price. The financial institution serving either as trustee or as fiscal agent for the Agency holding the obligations subject to the repurchase agreement hereunder or the depository issuing the safekeeping receipt shall not be the provider of the repurchase agreement.

A valid and perfected first security interest in the obligations which are the subject of the repurchase agreement has been granted to the Agency or its assignee or book entry procedures, conforming, to the extent practicable, with federal regulations and satisfactory to the agency have been established for the benefit of the Agency or its assignee.

The securities are free and clear of any adverse third-party claims.

The repurchase agreement is in a form satisfactory to the Agency.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 11; 1973, c. 1296, s. 51; 1985, c. 479, s. 149(b); 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 185; 1997-13, s. 2; 2001-181, s. 1.

§ 122A-12.
Remedies.

Any holder of obligations issued under the provisions of this Chapter or any coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust agreement or resolution authorizing the issuance of such obligations, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by such trust agreement or resolution, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the State or granted hereunder or under such trust agreement or resolution, or under any other contract executed by the Agency pursuant to this Chapter, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this Chapter or by such trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the Agency or by any officer thereof.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 12; 1973, c. 1296, s. 52.

§ 122A-13.
Negotiable instruments.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this Chapter or any recitals in any obligations issued under the provisions of this Chapter, all such obligations and interest coupons appertaining thereto shall be and are hereby made negotiable instruments under the laws of this State, subject only to any applicable provisions for registration.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 13.

§ 122A-14.
Obligations eligible for investment.

Obligations issued under the provisions of this Chapter are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the State and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such obligations are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any State or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the State for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds, notes or obligations of the State is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 14.

§ 122A-15.
Refunding obligations.

The Agency is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance of refunding obligations for the purpose of refunding any obligations then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of this Chapter, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such obligations and, if deemed advisable by the Agency, for any corporate purpose of the Agency. The issuance of such obligations, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties and obligations of the Agency in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of this Chapter which relate to the issuance of obligations, insofar as such provisions may be appropriate therefor.

Refunding obligations may be sold or exchanged for outstanding obligations issued under this Chapter and, if sold, the proceeds thereof may be applied, in addition to any other authorized purposes, to the purchase, redemption or payment of such outstanding obligations. Pending the application of the proceeds of any such refunding obligations, with any other available funds, to the payment of the principal, accrued interest and any redemption premium on the obligations being refunded, and, if so provided or permitted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such refunding obligations or in the trust agreement securing the same, to the payment of any interest on such refunding obligations and any expenses in connection with such refunding, such proceeds may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and the interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America which shall mature or which shall be subject to redemption by the holders thereof, at the option of such holders, not later than the respective dates when the proceeds, together with the interest accruing thereon, will be required for the purposes intended.

History.

1965, c. 1235, s. 15; 1973, c. 1296, s. 55.

§ 122A-16.
Oversight by committees of General Assembly; annual reports.

The Finance Committee of the House of Representatives and the Finance Committee of the Senate shall exercise continuing oversight of the Agency in order to assure that the Agency is effectively fulfilling its statutory purpose; provided, however, that nothing in this Chapter shall be construed as required by the Agency to receive legislative approval for the exercise of any of the powers granted by this Chapter. The Agency shall, promptly following the close of each fiscal year, submit an annual report of its activities for the preceding year to the Governor, the Office of State Budget and Management, State Auditor, the aforementioned committees of the General Assembly and the Local Government Commission. Each such report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement of the Agency during such year. The Agency shall cause an audit of its books and accounts to be made at least once in each year by an independent certified public accountant and the cost thereof may be paid from any available moneys of the Agency. The Agency shall on January 1 and July 1 of each year submit a written report of its activities to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations. The Agency shall also at the end of each fiscal year submit a written report of its budget expenditures by line item to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 16; 1973, c. 1296, s. 56; 1977, c. 673, s. 3; c. 771, s. 4; 1981, c. 895, s. 4; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1191, s. 34; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 134; 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2006-203, s. 67.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-203, s. 67, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to the budget for the 2007-2009 biennium and each subsequent biennium thereafter, deleted “the Advisory Budget Commission” following “General Assembly” in the second sentence.

§ 122A-17.
Officers not liable.

No member or other officer of the Agency shall be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of his execution of any obligations or the issuance thereof.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 17; 1973, c. 1296, s. 57.

§ 122A-18.
Authorization to accept appropriated moneys.

The Agency is authorized to accept such moneys as may be appropriated from time to time by the General Assembly for effectuating its corporate purposes including, without limitation, the payment of the initial expenses of administration and operation and the establishment of a reserve or contingency fund to be available for the payment of the principal of and the interest on any bonds or notes of the Agency.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 18; 1973, c. 1296, s. 58.

§ 122A-19.
Tax exemption.

The exercise of the powers granted by this Chapter will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the State, for their well-being and prosperity and for the improvement of their social and economic conditions, and the Agency shall not be required to pay any tax or assessment on any property owned by the Agency under the provisions of this Chapter or upon the income therefrom.

Any obligations issued by the Agency under the provisions of this Chapter shall at all times be free from taxation by the State or any local unit or political subdivision or other instrumentality of the State, excepting inheritance or gift taxes, income taxes on the gain from the transfer of the obligations, and franchise taxes. The interest on the obligations is not subject to taxation as income.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 19; 1973, c. 1296, s. 59; 1995, c. 46, s. 10.

§ 122A-20.
Conflict of interest.

If any member, officer or employee of the Agency shall be interested either directly or indirectly, or shall be an officer or employee of or have an ownership interest in any firm or corporation interested directly or indirectly in any contract with the Agency, including any loan to any sponsor, builder or developer, such interest shall be disclosed to the Agency and shall be set forth in the minutes of the Agency, and the member, officer or employee having such interest therein shall not participate on behalf of the Agency in the authorization of any such contract.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 20; 1973, c. 1296, s. 60.

§ 122A-21.
Additional method.

The foregoing sections of this Chapter shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing; provided, however, that the issuance of bonds or notes under the provisions of this Chapter need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds or notes.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 21.

§ 122A-22.
Chapter liberally construed.

This Chapter, being necessary for the prosperity of the State and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 22.

§ 122A-23.
Inconsistent laws inapplicable.

Insofar as the provisions of this Chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any general or special laws, or parts thereof, the provisions of this Chapter shall be controlling.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 24.